Missouri, session 2026, SB1235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 575.095 and 575.260, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 575.095 and 575.260, to read as follows:
575.095. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering
with a judicial officer if, with the purpose to harass,
intimidate or influence a judicial officer in the
performance of such officer's official duties, such person:
(1) Threatens or causes harm to such judicial officer
or members of such judicial officer's family;
(2) Uses force, threats, or deception against or
toward such judicial officer or members of such judicial
officer's family;
(3) Offers, conveys or agrees to convey any benefit
direct or indirect upon such judicial officer or such
judicial officer's family;
(4) Engages in conduct reasonably calculated to harass
or alarm such judicial officer or such judicial officer's
family, including stalking pursuant to section 565.225 or
565.227;

SB 1235 2
(5) Disseminates through any means, including by
posting on the internet, the judicial officer's or the
judicial officer's family's personal information. For
purposes of this section, "personal information" includes a
home address, home or mobile telephone number, personal
email address, Social Security number, federal tax
identification number, checking or savings account number,
marital status, and identity of a child under eighteen years
of age.
2. A judicial officer for purposes of this section
shall be a judge or commissioner of a state or federal
court, arbitrator, special master, juvenile officer, deputy
juvenile officer, state prosecuting or circuit attorney,
state assistant prosecuting or circuit attorney, juvenile
court commissioner, state probation or parole officer, or
referee.
3. A judicial officer's family for purposes of this
section shall be:
(1) Such officer's spouse; or
(2) Such officer or such officer's spouse's ancestor
or descendant by blood or adoption; or
(3) Such officer's stepchild, while the marriage
creating that relationship exists.
4. The offense of tampering with a judicial officer is
a class D felony.
5. If a violation of this section results in death or
bodily injury to a judicial officer or a member of the
judicial officer's family, the offense is a class B felony.
6. No person convicted under subdivisions (1) or (2)
of subsection 1 or under subsection 5 of this section shall
be eligible for parole, probation, or conditional release.

SB 1235 3
575.260. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering
with a judicial proceeding if, with the purpose to influence
the official action of a judge, juror, special master,
referee, arbitrator, state prosecuting or circuit attorney,
state assistant prosecuting or circuit attorney, or attorney
general in a judicial proceeding, he or she:
(1) Threatens or causes harm to any person or
property; or
(2) Engages in conduct reasonably calculated to harass
or alarm such official or juror; or
(3) Offers, confers, or agrees to confer any benefit,
direct or indirect, upon such official or juror.
2. The offense of tampering with a judicial proceeding
is a class D felony. No person convicted under subdivision
(1) of subsection 1 of this section shall be eligible for
parole, probation, or conditional release.
✓